Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
D. Officers

§ 17-19-840.
Required officers.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles or bylaws, a corporation shall have a president, a secretary, a treasurer and any other officers as are appointed by the board.

The bylaws or the board shall delegate to one (1) of the officers responsibility for preparing minutes of the directors’ and members’ meetings and for authenticating records of the corporation.

The same individual may simultaneously hold more than one (1) office in a corporation.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 17-19-841.
Duties and authority of officers.

Each officer has the authority and shall perform the duties set forth in the bylaws or, to the extent consistent with the bylaws, the duties and authority prescribed in a resolution of the board or by direction of an officer authorized by the board to prescribe the duties and authority of other officers.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 17-19-842.
Standards of conduct for officers.

An officer who is an employee of the corporation with discretionary authority shall discharge his duties under that authority:

In good faith;

With the care an ordinarily prudent person in a like position would exercise under similar circumstances; and

In a manner the officer reasonably believes to be in the best interests of the corporation and its members, if any.

In discharging his duties an officer who is an employee of the corporation is entitled to rely on information, opinions, reports or statements, including financial statements and other financial data, if prepared or presented by:

One (1) or more officers or employees of the corporation whom the officer reasonably believes to be reliable and competent in the matters presented;

Legal counsel, public accountants or other persons as to matters the officer reasonably believes are within the person’s professional or expert competence; or

In the case of religious corporations, religious authorities and ministers, priests, rabbis or other persons whose position or duties in the religious organization the officer believes justify reliance and confidence and whom the officer believes to be reliable and competent in the matters presented.

An officer who is an employee of the corporation is not acting in good faith if the officer has knowledge concerning the matter in question that makes reliance otherwise permitted by subsection (b) of this section unwarranted.

An officer who is an employee of the corporation is not liable to the corporation, any member or other person for any action taken or not taken as an officer, if the officer acted in compliance with this section.

An officer of a corporation organized under this act, who is not an employee of the corporation is not individually liable for any actions, inactions or omissions by the corporation. This subsection does not affect individual liability for intentional torts or illegal acts.

Whether or not he is an employee of the corporation, an officer shall not be deemed to be a trustee with respect to the corporation or with respect to any property held or administered by the corporation, including without limit, property that may be subject to restrictions imposed by the donor or transferor of the property.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the first sentence in subsection (e), see § 17-19-140(a)(xxxvii).

Application. —

This section did not establish existence of special relationship of trust and reliance sufficient to support discharged officer's claim against employer for breach of implied covenant of good faith and fair dealing. Andrews v. Southwest Wyo. Rehabilitation Ctr., 974 P.2d 948,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1999).

§ 17-19-843.
Resignation and removal of officers.

An officer may resign at any time by delivering notice to the corporation. A resignation is effective when the notice is effective unless the notice specifies a future effective date. If a resignation is made effective at a future date and the corporation accepts the future effective date, its board of directors may fill the pending vacancy before the effective date if the board provides that the successor cannot take office until the effective date.

A board may remove any officer at any time with or without cause.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 17-19-844.
Contract rights of officers.

The appointment of an officer does not itself create contract rights.

An officer’s removal does not affect the officer’s contract rights, if any, with the corporation. An officer’s resignation does not affect the corporation’s contract rights, if any, with the officer.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 17-19-845.
Officers' authority to execute documents.

Any contract or other instrument in writing executed or entered into between a corporation and any other person is not invalidated as to the corporation by any lack of authority of the signing officers in the absence of actual knowledge on the part of the other person that the signing officers had no authority to execute the contract or other instrument if it is signed by any two (2) officers in Category 1 below or by one (1) officer in Category 1 below and one (1) individual in Category 2 below:

Category 1 — The presiding officer of the board and the president;

Category 2 — A vice president, the secretary, treasurer and executive director.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.